Hawaii, session 2026, SB2234.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  Section 201H-1, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by amending the definition of "qualified nonprofit housing trust" to read as follows: ""Qualified nonprofit housing trust" means a corporation, association, or other duly chartered organization that [is]: (1)  Is registered and in good standing with the State; [is] (2)  Is recognized by the Internal Revenue Service as a charitable or otherwise tax-exempt organization under section 501(c)(3) of the Internal Revenue Code of 1986, as amended; [and has] (3)  Has the capacity, resources, and mission to carry out the purposes of this chapter as determined by the corporation[.]; and (4)  Exclusively serves qualified residents as defined in section 201H-32." SECTION 2. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed and stricken.  New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 3. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2050. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________